Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
HB2289 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 401 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Federal Officials Security Act of 2025".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 402 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. The term "federal official" means any current federally
elected official of the state;
2. The term "commercial entity" means any corporation,
partnership, limited partnership, proprietorship, sole
proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, or association engaged
in the buying or selling of goods or services for profit;
3. The term "covered information" means:
a. a home address, including primary residence or
secondary residences of a federal official,
b. a home or personal mobile telephone number, or the
direct telephone number of a government-issued cell
phone or private extension in the chambers of a
federal official,
c. a personal email address of a federal official,

HB2289 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

d. the Social Security number, driver license number, or
home address displayed on voter registration
information of a federal official,
e. bank account or credit or debit card information of a
federal official,
f. the home or other address displayed on property tax
records or held by a federal, state, or local
government agency of a federal official, including any
secondary residence and any investment property at
which a federal official resides for part of a year,
g. a license plate number or home address displayed on
vehicle registration information of a federal
official,
h. the identification of children under the age of
eighteen (18) years of age of a federal official or
any child under the age of twenty-six (26) years of
age whose permanent residence is the home of the
federal official,
i. the full date of birth,
j. a photograph of any vehicle that legibly displays the
license plate or a photograph of a residence that
legibly displays the address of the residence of a
federal official,

HB2289 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

k. the name and address of a school or day care facility
attended by immediate family of a federal official,
l. the name and address of an employer of immediate
family of a federal official, or
m. the name and address of a place of worship the federal
official or immediate family of a federal official
attends;
4. The term "immediate family" means a spouse, child, or parent
of a federal official or any other familial relative of a federal
official whose permanent residence is the same as the federal
official;
5. The term "social media" means any online electronic medium
or a live chat system that:
a. primarily serves as a medium for users to interact
with content generated by other third-party users of
the medium,
b. enables users to create accounts or profiles specific
to the medium or to import profiles from another
medium, and
c. enables one or more users to generate content that can
be viewed by other third-party users of the medium;
6. The term "state agency" means:
a. an executive agency, as defined by Oklahoma Statute,

HB2289 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. any county, local or municipal governing body, or
regulatory body, and
c. any state agency in the judicial branch or legislative
branch; and
7. The term "transfer" means to sell, license, trade, or
exchange for consideration the covered information of a federal
official or immediate family.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 403 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Each federal official may:
1. File written notice of the status of the individual as a
federal official, for themselves and immediate family, with each
state agency that includes information necessary to ensure
compliance with this section; and
2. Request that each state agency described in Section 2 of
this act mark as private their covered information and that of their
immediate family.
B. State agencies shall not publicly post or publicly display
content that includes covered information of a federal official or
immediate family. State agencies, upon receipt of a written request
under paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section, shall remove the
covered information of the federal official or immediate family from

HB2289 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

publ icly available content not later than seventy-two (72) hours
after such receipt.
C. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a state agency from
providing access to records containing the covered information of a
federal official to a third party if the third party:
1. Possesses a signed release from the federal official or a
lawful court order;
2. Is subject to the requirements of Title V of the federal
Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C., Section 6801 et seq.; or
3. Executes a confidentiality agreement with the state agency.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 404 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Upon written request of a federal official, the Executive
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services is
authorized to make any notice or request required or authorized by
this act on behalf of the federal official. The notice or request
shall include information necessary to ensure compliance with this
act. The Executive Director may delegate this authority to an
appropriate state agency. Any notice or request made under this act
shall be deemed to have been made by the federal official and comply
with the notice and request requirements of this act.
In lieu of individual notices or requests, the Executive
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services may
HB2289 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

prov ide state agencies, county and municipal governments, commercial
entity, persons, businesses, or associations with a list of federal
officials and their immediate family that includes information
necessary to ensure compliance with this act, as determined by the
Executive Director for the purpose of maintaining compliance with
this act. Such list shall be deemed to comply with individual
notice and request requirements of this act.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 405 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Not later than one (1) year after the date of enactment of this
act, and biennially thereafter, the Executive Director of the Office
of Management and Enterprise Services shall submit to the
Legislature an annual report that includes:
1. A detailed amount spent by the state and local governments
on protecting federal officials' covered information;
2. Where the federal officials' covered information was found;
and
3. The collection of any new types of personal data found to be
used to identify federal officials who have received threats,
including prior home addresses, employers, and institutional
affiliations such as nonprofit boards.


HB2289 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 406 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, no
person, business, or association shall publicly post or publicly
display on the Internet covered information of a federal official or
immediate family if the federal official has made a written request
to that person, business, or association to not disclose the covered
information of the federal official or immediate family.
B. Subsection A of this section shall not apply to:
1. Covered information that the federal official or immediate
family voluntarily publishes on the Internet after the date of
enactment of this act; or
2. Covered information lawfully received from a state
government source or from an employee or agent of the state
government.
C. After receiving a written request under this section, the
person, business, or association shall remove within seventy-two
(72) hours the covered information from the Internet and ensure that
the information is not made available on any publicly available
website controlled by that person, business, or association, and
ensure that the covered information of the federal official or
immediate family is not made available on any publicly available
website controlled by that person, business, or association.
HB2289 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

D. This section shall not apply to:
1. Covered information that the federal official or immediate
family voluntarily publishes on the Internet after the date of
enactment of this act; or
2. A transfer made at the request of the federal official or
that is necessary to effectuate a request to the person, business,
or association from the federal official.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 407 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A federal official or their immediate family whose covered
information is made public as a result of a violation of this act
may bring an action seeking injunctive or declaratory relief in any
court of competent jurisdiction. If the court grants injunctive or
declaratory relief, the person, business, or association responsible
for the violation shall be required to pay the costs and reasonable
attorney fees of the federal official or immediate family, as
applicable.
B. If a person, business, or association knowingly violates an
order granting injunctive or declaratory relief under subsection A
of this section, the court issuing such order may:
1. If the person, business, or association is a government
agency:

HB2289 HFLR Page 9
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

a. impose a fine not greater than Four Thousand Dollars
($4,000.00), and
b. award to the federal official or their immediate
family, as applicable, court costs and reasonable
attorney fees; and
2. If the person, business, or association is not a government
agency, award to the federal official or their immediate family, as
applicable:
a. an amount equal to the actual damages sustained by the
federal official or their immediate family, and
b. court costs and reasonable attorney fees.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 408 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Nothing in this act shall be construed:
1. To prohibit, restrain, or limit the lawful investigation or
reporting by the press of any unlawful activity or misconduct
alleged to have been committed by a federal official or their
immediate family;
2. To limit the publication or transfer of covered information
that the federal official or their immediate family member
voluntarily publishes on the Internet after the date of enactment of
this act; or

HB2289 HFLR Page 10
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

3. To prohibit information sharing by a commercial entity to a
federal, state, tribal, or local government, or any unit thereof.
B. This act shall be broadly construed to favor the protection
of the covered information of federal officials and their immediate
family.
SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 409 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
If any provision of this act, an amendment made by this act, or
the application of such provision or amendment to any person or
circumstance is held to be unconstitutional, the remainder of this
act and the amendments made by this act and the application of the
remaining provisions of this act and amendments to any person or
circumstance shall not be affected.
SECTION 10. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
03/06/2025 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.







HB2289 HFLR Page 11
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.